District of Columbia statutes.
29-407.04

Articles of domestication.

(a)

Articles of domestication shall be signed on behalf of the domesticating corporation by any officer or other duly authorized representative. The articles shall set forth:

(1)

The name and jurisdiction of incorporation of the domesticating corporation;

(2)

The name and jurisdiction of incorporation of the domesticated entity; and

(3)

If the domesticating corporation is a domestic nonprofit corporation, a statement that the plan of domestication was approved in accordance with this subtitle [subchapter] or, if the domesticating corporation is a foreign nonprofit corporation, a statement that the domestication was approved in accordance with the law of its jurisdiction of incorporation.

(b)

If the domesticated corporation is a domestic nonprofit corporation, the articles of domestication shall either contain all of the provisions that § 29-402.02(a) requires to be set forth in articles of incorporation and any other desired provisions that § 29-402.02(b) and (c) permits to be included in articles of incorporation, or must have attached articles of incorporation. In either case, provisions that would not be required to be included in restated articles of incorporation may be omitted, except that the name and address of the initial registered agent of the domesticated corporation shall be included. The name of the domesticated corporation shall satisfy the requirements of § 29-103.01.

(c)

The articles of domestication shall be delivered to the Mayor for filing and take effect at the effective time provided in § 29-102.03.

(d)

If the domesticating corporation is a registered foreign nonprofit corporation, its certificate of registration shall be canceled automatically on the effective date of its domestication.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(d)(15), 59 DCR 13171

Effect of Amendments

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-210 substituted “registered” for “qualified” in (d).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.